dev/apertium-ne-en.ne.dix
    <pardef n="घस्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>कौने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="छस्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="मार/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्न</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दा</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौं</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="भो__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="बन/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्न</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाउन</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाउनु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नोस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दा</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाए</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाइए</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाएर</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाउँछु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाउँछेस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्यो</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="हुर्क__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाउँदा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="संझ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ें</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>न्छु</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="पच/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाउँछस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="आए__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="भन__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेँ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="भन__opt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोस्</l>
          <r><s n="opt"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ह/ुन्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुन्थें</l>
          <r>ुन्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>भइरे</l>
          <r>ुन्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुन्छु</l>
          <r>ुन्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुन्छौ</l>
          <r>ुन्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुनेछौ</l>
          <r>ुन्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुन्थ्यौ</l>
          <r>ुन्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुन्छ्यौ</l>
          <r>ुन्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुन्छ</l>
          <r>ुन्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुन्थ्यो</l>
          <r>ुन्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुन्न</l>
          <r>ुन्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुन्</l>
          <r>ुन्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="हुर्क"><i>हुर्क</i><par n="हुर्क__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="आउँछन्"><i>आउँछन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="भन्छन्"><i>भन्छन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सक्छन्"><i>सक्छन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="घस्"><i>घस्</i><par n="घस्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="गर्छन्"><i>गर्छन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पर्छन्"><i>पर्छन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="गरिरहेछन्"><i>गरिरहेछन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="परे"><i>परे</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="छन"><i>छन</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="देख्छन्"><i>देख्छन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="दिन्छन्"><i>दिन्छन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="भो"><i>भो</i><par n="भो__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="होइनन्"><i>होइनन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लाग्छन्"><i>लाग्छन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पर्दछन्"><i>पर्दछन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="भन्थे"><i>भन्थे</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="रहेछन्"><i>रहेछन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="गरिदिए"><i>गरिदिए</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सकेनन्"><i>सकेनन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="राख्छन्"><i>राख्छन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="देखिन्छन्"><i>देखिन्छन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="गर्दैनन्"><i>गर्दैनन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लिन्छन्"><i>लिन्छन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="रहन्छन्"><i>रहन्छन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बनाए"><i>बनाए</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="भने"><i>भने</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="राखे"><i>राखे</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पाएनन्"><i>पाएनन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="गर्दछन्"><i>गर्दछन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पसे"><i>पसे</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हुन्"><i>ह</i><par n="ह/ुन्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="भन"><i>भन</i><par n="भन__opt"/></e>
    <e lm="भन"><i>भन</i><par n="भन__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ढिस्"><i>ढिस्</i><par n="छस्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="थाल्दछन्"><i>थाल्दछन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बन्"><i>बन</i><par n="बन/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बने"><i>बने</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हैन"><i>हैन</i><par n="भो__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पुग्छन्"><i>पुग्छन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बताए"><i>बताए</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="दिएनन्"><i>दिएनन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="भन्दछन्"><i>भन्दछन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बताउँछन्"><i>बताउँछन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="छैनन"><i>छैनन</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सक्तछन्"><i>सक्तछन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सक्दछन्"><i>सक्दछन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पाउँछन्"><i>पाउँछन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="जान्छन्"><i>जान्छन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सक्तैनन्"><i>सक्तैनन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पुग्दछन्"><i>पुग्दछन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हुँदैनन्"><i>हुँदैनन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="आए"><i>आए</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="गरेनन्"><i>गरेनन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="चाहन्छन्"><i>चाहन्छन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ठान्दछन्"><i>ठान्दछन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="गर्दैछन्"><i>गर्दैछन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बस्छन्"><i>बस्छन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सक्छौं"><i>सक्छौं</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="दिंदैनन्"><i>दिंदैनन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लगाए"><i>लगाए</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पाइन्छन्"><i>पाइन्छन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पच्"><i>पच</i><par n="पच/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="छन्"><i>छन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="मान्दछन्"><i>मान्दछन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हुन्छन्"><i>हुन्छन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="मार्"><i>मार</i><par n="मार/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="भेटिन्छन्"><i>भेटिन्छन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="थिस्"><i>थिस्</i><par n="छस्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="संझ"><i>संझ</i><par n="संझ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ठान्छन्"><i>ठान्छन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="खान्छन्"><i>खान्छन्</i><par n="आए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="छस्"><i>छस्</i><par n="छस्__vblex"/></e>
